Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2912.02
Best practices; policies and procedures.

The office and the approved centers shall strive to conduct restorative justice programs in accordance with best practices, including evidence-based programs, and shall adopt policies and procedures to accomplish this goal.

Laws 2019, LB595, § 12.